Wisconsin, session 2025, SB327.
do enact as follows:SB327,11Section 1. 106.50 (2r) (br) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB327,3,42106.50 (2r) (br) 2. If an individual keeps or is seeking to keep an emotional 3support animal in housing, an owner, lessor, lessor’s agent, owner’s agent, or 4representative of a condominium association may request that the individual 5submit to the owner, lessor, agent, or representative reliable documentation that 1the individual has a disability and reliable documentation of the disability-related 2need for the emotional support animal from a licensed health professional, and may 3also request documentation of a prescription for the emotional support animal from 4a licensed health professional.SB327,25Section 2. 106.50 (2r) (br) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:SB327,3,106106.50 (2r) (br) 5. An individual shall forfeit not less than $500 if he or she, 7for the purpose of obtaining housing, intentionally misrepresents that he or she has 8a disability or, misrepresents the need for an emotional support animal to assist 9with his or her disability, or provides false documentation of a prescription for an 10emotional support animal to assist with his or her disability.SB327,311Section 3. 106.50 (2r) (br) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:SB327,3,1812106.50 (2r) (br) 6. A licensed health professional shall forfeit not less than 13$500 if he or she, for the purpose of allowing the patient to obtain housing, 14misrepresents that his or her patient has a disability or, misrepresents his or her 15patient’s need for an emotional support animal to assist with his or her patient’s 16disability, or provides a prescription for an emotional support animal to assist with 17his or her patient’s disability without having at least a 30-day patient-provider 18relationship with the patient.SB327,419Section 4. 106.52 (1) (fm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB327,4,320106.52 (1) (fm) “Service animal” means a guide dog, signal dog, or other 21animal that is individually trained or is being trained to do work or perform tasks 22for the benefit of a person with a disability, including the work or task of guiding a 23person with impaired vision, alerting a person with impaired hearing to intruders 24or sound, providing minimal protection or rescue work, pulling a wheelchair, or 1fetching dropped items dog that meets the definition of “service animal” in 28 CFR 235.104 and includes a miniature horse under circumstances that meet the 3standards set forth in 28 CFR 35.136 (i) and a service animal in training.SB327,54Section 5. 106.52 (1) (fs) of the statutes is created to read:SB327,4,65106.52 (1) (fs) “Service animal in training” means a dog or miniature horse 6that is being trained to be a service animal by a service animal trainer. SB327,67Section 6. 106.52 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB327,4,118106.52 (6) Claiming to possess a service animal. (a) A person who, with 9knowledge that the representation is false, intentionally represents that he or she is 10in possession of a service animal while at any public place of accommodation or 11amusement is subject to the following penalties:SB327,4,14121. For a first violation under this paragraph, a forfeiture of not more than 13$200. In lieu of a forfeiture, the court may require that the person perform 20 hours 14of community service work for an organization that serves persons with disabilities.SB327,4,18152. For a 2nd or subsequent violation under this paragraph, a forfeiture of not 16more than $500. In lieu of a forfeiture, the court may require that the person 17perform 40 hours of community service work for an organization that serves 18persons with disabilities.SB327,4,2019(b) The department shall prepare and make available to businesses upon 20request all of the following:SB327,4,23211. Signage suitable for posting on a front window or door stating “task-trained 22service animals are welcome” and that misrepresenting an animal as a service 23animal is a violation of state law.SB327,5,2242. An informational brochure detailing the rights of businesses relating to 1service animals in their place of business and what is and is not a lawful way to 2ascertain if a person is violating par. (a).SB327,73Section 7. Nonstatutory provisions.SB327,5,94(1) Business signage. In preparing the materials described in s. 106.52 (6) 5(b), the department of workforce development shall consult with a member of a 6service animal organization accredited by Assistance Dogs International or the 7International Guide Dog Federation or a successor organization, a member of an 8organization advocating for the interests of restaurant owners, and a member of an 9organization advocating for the interests of business owners.SB327,5,1010